Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1114.02
County officers; salaries; Class 1 counties.

In counties of Class 1, the county clerk, treasurer, sheriff, attorney, and appointive full-time veterans service officer shall each receive a minimum annual salary of five thousand five hundred dollars, to be paid periodically as other county employees out of the general fund.

Laws 1961, c. 96, § 2, p. 324;

Laws 1967, c. 128, § 2, p. 410;

Laws 1967, c. 126, § 1, p. 404;

Laws 1967, c. 127, § 1, p. 406;

Laws 1969, c. 164, § 1, p. 739;

Laws 1971, LB 574, § 2;

Laws 1972, LB 1157, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 220, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 6.